Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-274
Contents, defined.

Contents, when used with respect to any wire, electronic, or oral communication, includes any information concerning the substance, purport, or meaning of such communication.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 136.